client/modules/cm-espells/vendor/de.aff
compoundwords controlled _
compoundmin 3

#
#  Used chars: Prefix: GUV
#  Suffix: ABCDEF_HIJKLMNOPQRST_WXYZ
#  suffix: _f_mnopqrstuvw_
#  erstellt von transam email: transam45@gmx.net
#  (c) owner: transam45.gmx.net
# The *.dic and *.aff file contained in this package are distributed
#  under the LGPL license, see http://www.fsf.org for the text of this licence.

TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

prefixes

flag U:
   .    > UN

flag V:
   .    > VER

suffixes

flag *A:
   E    > R
   E    > N
   E    > M
   E    > S
   [^ELR]    > E
   [^ELR]    > ER
   [^ELR]    > EN
   [^ELR]    > EM
   [^ELR]    > ES
   [^E][RL]    > E
   [^E][RL]    > ER
   [^E][RL]    > EN
   [^E][RL]    > EM
   [^E][RL]    > ES
   [^U]ER    > E
   [^U]ER    > ER
   [^U]ER    > EN
   [^U]ER    > EM
   [^U]ER    > ES
   UER    > -ER,RE
   UER    > -ER,RER
   UER    > -ER,REN
   UER    > -ER,REM
   UER    > -ER,RES
   [EIL]EL    > E
   [EIL]EL    > ER
   [EIL]EL    > EN
   [EIL]EL    > EM
   [EIL]EL    > ES
   [^EIL]EL    > -EL,LE
   [^EIL]EL    > -EL,LER
   [^EIL]EL    > -EL,LEN
   [^EIL]EL    > -EL,LEM
   [^EIL]EL    > -EL,LES
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIG
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGE
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGER
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGEN
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGEM
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGES
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIG
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGE
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGER
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGEN
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGEM
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGES

flag B:
   E[LR]N    > -N,BAR
   E[LR]N    > -N,BARE
   E[LR]N    > -N,BAREN
   E[LR]N    > -N,BARER
   E[LR]N    > -N,BARES
   E[LR]N    > -N,BAREM
   EN    > -EN,BAR
   EN    > -EN,BARE
   EN    > -EN,BAREN
   EN    > -EN,BARER
   EN    > -EN,BARES
   EN    > -EN,BAREM

flag *C:
   [^ELR]    > ER
   [^ELR]    > ERE
   [^ELR]    > ERER
   [^ELR]    > EREN
   [^ELR]    > EREM
   [^ELR]    > ERES
   E    > R
   E    > RE
   E    > RER
   E    > REN
   E    > REM
   E    > RES
   [^E][LR]    > ER
   [^E][LR]    > ERE
   [^E][LR]    > ERER
   [^E][LR]    > EREN
   [^E][LR]    > EREM
   [^E][LR]    > ERES
   [^D]EL    > -EL,LER
   [^D]EL    > -EL,LERE
   [^D]EL    > -EL,LERER
   [^D]EL    > -EL,LEREN
   [^S]EL    > -EL,LEREM
   [^D]EL    > -EL,LERES
   UER    > -ER,RER
   UER    > -ER,RERE
   UER    > -ER,RERER
   UER    > -ER,REREN
   UER    > -ER,REREM
   UER    > -ER,RERES
   [^U]ER    > ER
   [^U]ER    > ERE
   [^U]ER    > ERER
   [^U]ER    > EREN
   [^U]ER    > EREM
   [^U]ER    > ERES
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGER
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGERE
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGERER
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGEREN
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGEREM
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGERES
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGER
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGERE
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGERER
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGEREN
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGEREM
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGERES
   [KßSUXZ]    > EST
   [KßSUXZ]    > ESTE
   [KßSUXZ]    > ESTER
   [KßSUXZ]    > ESTEN
   [KßSUXZ]    > ESTEM
   [KßSUXZ]    > ESTES
   SS    > EST
   SS    > ESTE
   SS    > ESTER
   SS    > ESTEN
   SS    > ESTEM
   SS    > ESTES
   ET    > ST
   ET    > STE
   ET    > STER
   ET    > STEN
   ET    > STEM
   ET    > STES
   [^E]T    > EST
   [^E]T    > ESTE
   [^E]T    > ESTER
   [^E]T    > ESTEN
   [^E]T    > ESTEM
   [^E]T    > ESTES
   [^KßSTXZ]    > ST
   [^KßSTXZ]    > STE
   [^KßSTXZ]    > STER
   [^KßSTXZ]    > STEN
   [^KßSTXZ]    > STEM
   [^KßSTXZ]    > STES
   ND    > ST
   ND    > STE
   ND    > STER
   ND    > STEN
   ND    > STEM
   ND    > STES
   [^N]D    > EST
   [^N]D    > ESTE
   [^N]D    > ESTER
   [^N]D    > ESTEN
   [^N]D    > ESTEM
   [^N]D    > ESTES
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGST
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGSTE
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGSTER
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGSTEN
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGSTEM
   [^AEIOUHLRäüö]LIG    > -LIG,ELIGSTES
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGST
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGSTE
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGSTER
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGSTEN
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGSTEM
   [^HI]ERIG    > -ERIG,RIGSTES

flag *D:
   N    > D
   N    > DE
   N    > DEN
   N    > DER
   N    > DES
   N    > DEM

flag *E:
   .    > E

flag F:
   IN    > NEN
   E    > -E,IN
   E    > -E,INNEN
   [^I]N    > IN
   [^I]N    > INNEN
   [^EN]    > IN
   [^EN]    > INNEN
   ABE    > -ABE,äBIN  
   ABE    > -ABE,äBINNEN  
   ACHS    > -ACHS,äCHSIN  
   ACHS    > -ACHS,äCHSINNEN  
   ACHSE    > -ACHSE,äCHSIN  
   ACHSE    > -ACHSE,äCHSINNEN  
   AF    > -AF,äFIN  
   AF    > -AF,äFINNEN  
   AGER    > -AGER,äGERIN  
   AGER    > -AGER,äGERINNEN  
   ALE    > -ALE,äLIN  
   ALE    > -ALE,äLINNEN  
   ANKE    > -ANKE,äNKIN  
   ANKE    > -ANKE,äNKINNEN  
   APST    > -APST,äPSTIN  
   APST    > -APST,äPSTINNEN  
   ARR    > -ARR,äRRIN  
   ARR    > -ARR,äRRINNEN  
   ARZT    > -ARZT,äRZTIN  
   ARZT    > -ARZT,äRZTINNEN  
   ASE    > -ASE,äSIN  
   ASE    > -ASE,äSINNEN  
   AT    > -AT,äTIN
   AT    > -AT,äTINNEN  
   ATZE    > -ATZE,äTZIN
   ATZE    > -ATZE,äTZINNEN  
   AUER    > -AUER,äUERIN  
   AUER    > -AUER,äUERINNEN  
   ERER    > ERIN  
   ERER    > ERINNEN  
   INZ    > ESSIN  
   INZ    > ESSINNEN  
   MANN    > -MANN,MäNNIN  
   MANN    > -MANN,MäNNINNEN  
   SACHSE    > -SACHSE,SäCHSIN  
   SACHSE    > -SACHSE,SäCHSINNEN  
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHIN  
   OCH    > -OCH,öCHINNEN  
   ORCH    > -ORCH,öRCHIN  
   ORCH    > -ORCH,öRCHINNEN  
   OLF    > -OLF,öLFIN  
   OLF    > -OLF,öLFINNEN  
   OF    > -OF,öFIN  
   OF    > -OF,öFINNEN  
   OSE    > -OSE,öSIN  
   OSE    > -OSE,öSINNEN  
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTIN  
   OTT    > -OTT,öTTINNEN  
   UCHS    > -UCHS,üCHSIN  
   UCHS    > -UCHS,üCHSINNEN  
   UDE    > -UDE,üDIN  
   UDE    > -UDE,üDINNEN 
   UND    > -UND,üNDIN  
   UND    > -UND,üNDINNEN  
   WALT    > -WALT,WäLTIN  
   WALT    > -WALT,WäLTINNEN  

flag H:
   .    > HEIT
   .    > HEITEN

flag *I:
   EN    > -N,
   ELN    > -ELN,LE
   ELN    > -N,E
   ERN    > -ERN,RE
   ERN    > -N,E
   E[LR]N    > -N,T
   [DT]EN    > -N,T
   [^DIMNT]EN    > -EN,T
   EIEN    > -EN,T
   [^E]IEN    > -N,T
   CHNEN    > -N,T
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,T
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,T
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,T
   UN    > -N,E
   UN    > -N,T

flag *J:
   [BGKPßSZ]ELN    > -N,UNG
   [BGKPßSZ]ELN    > -N,UNGEN
   ELN    > -ELN,LUNG
   ERN    > -N,UNG
   EN    > -EN,UNG
   ELN    > -ELN,LUNGEN
   ERN    > -N,UNGEN
   EN    > -EN,UNGEN
   [^N]    > UNG
   [^N]    > UNGEN
   EL    > -EL,LUNG
   EL    > -EL,LUNGEN

flag K:
   .    > KEIT
   .    > KEITEN

flag L:
   N    > TLICH
   N    > TLICHE
   N    > TLICHER
   N    > TLICHES
   N    > TLICHEM
   N    > TLICHEN
   [^N]    > LICH
   [^N]    > LICHE
   [^N]    > LICHER
   [^N]    > LICHES
   [^N]    > LICHEM
   [^N]    > LICHEN

flag M:
   [^S][^S]    > CHEN
   [^S][^S]    > CHENS
   [^E]    > CHEN
   [^E]    > CHENS
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSCHEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSCHENS
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSCHEN
   OSS    > -OSS,öSSCHENS
   USS    > -USS,üSSCHEN
   USS    > -USS,üSSCHENS
   E    > -E,CHEN
   E    > -E,CHENS

flag *N:
   .    > N

flag *O:
   E[LR]N    > -N,TES
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TES
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TES
   CHNEN    > -N,TES
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TES
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TES
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TES
   E[LR]N    > -N,TER
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TER
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TER
   CHNEN    > -N,TER
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TER
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TER
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TER
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEM
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEM
   [^DMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEM
   CHNEN    > -N,TEM
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEM
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEM
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEM

flag *P:
   .    > EN

flag *Q:
   S    > -S,SSE
   S    > -S,SSEN
   S    > -S,SSES

flag *R:
   [^E]    > ER
   [^E]    > ERN
   E    > R
   E    > RN

flag *S:
   [^Sß]    > S
   ß    > ES
   SS    > ES
   [^S]S    > -S,SES

#flag *~:
#   [^S] > S 

flag ~x:
   E    > N
   .    > S

flag ~y:
   .    > ES

flag ~z:
   .    > EN

flag *T:
   .    > ES

flag *W:
   [^IMN]EN    > -EN,
   EIEN    > -EN,
   [^BGHT][MN]EN    > -EN,
   [^C]HNEN    > -EN,
   E[LR]N    > -N,
   [^S]ST    > -ST,
   SST    > -T,
   [^S]T    > -T,

flag *X:
   E[LR]N    > -N,T
   [DTW]EN    > -N,T
   EIEN    > -EN,T
   [^E]IEN    > -N,T
   [^DITMNW]EN    > -EN,T
   CHNEN    > -N,T
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,T
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,T
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,T
   UN    > -N,T
   TST    > -ST,
   E[LR]N    > -N,ST
   [DTW]EN    > -N,ST
   [^DIMNßSTWZX]EN    > -EN,ST
   EIEN    > -EN,ST
   [^E]IEN    > -N,ST
   CHNEN    > -N,ST
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,ST
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,ST
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,ST
   UN    > -N,ST
   [ßSXZ]EN    > -N,ST
   SSEN    > -N,ST
   SCHEN    > -N,ST
   [^SZ]T    > -T,ST
   ZT    > -T,EST

flag *Y:
   E[LR]N    > -N,TE
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TE
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TE
   EIEN    > -EN,TE
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TE
   CHNEN    > -N,TE
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TE
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TE
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TE
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEST
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEST
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEST
   EIEN    > -EN,TEST
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TEST
   CHNEN    > -N,TEST
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEST
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEST
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEST
   E[LR]N    > -N,TET
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TET
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TET
   EIEN    > -EN,TET
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TET
   CHNEN    > -N,TET
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TET
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TET
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TET
   E[LR]N    > -N,TEN
   [DTW]EN    > -N,TEN
   [^DIMNTW]EN    > -EN,TEN
   EIEN    > -EN,TEN
   [^E]IEN    > -N,TEN
   CHNEN    > -N,TEN
   [^C]H[MN]EN    > -EN,TEN
   [^AäEHILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -N,TEN
   [AäEILMNOöUüR][MN]EN    > -EN,TEN

flag *Z:
   [^HßSZ]    > ST
   [^C]H    > ST
   [^S]CH    > ST
   [DFKSTZ]    > EST
   CH    > EST
   [AU]ß    > EST
   IEß    > EST
   [IO]SS    > EST
   [^DT]    > T
   [DTGB]    > ET
   E    > N
   IE    > EN
   [^E]    > EN

flag *f:
   PH    > -PH,F
   PH    > -PH,FEN
   PHIE    > -PHIE,FIE
   PHIE    > -PHIE,FIEN
